New Jersey, session 222, A3364.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    Section 1 of P.L.2011, c.183 (C.2C:36-6.2) is amended to read as follows: 1.    a.  Notwithstanding any State law, rule, or regulation to the contrary, a licensed pharmacy [may] shall sell a hypodermic syringe or needle, or any other instrument adapted for the administration of drugs by injection, to a person over 18 years of age who presents valid photo identification to demonstrate proof of age or who otherwise satisfies the seller that he is over 18 years of age, as follows: (1)   without a prescription if sold in quantities of between one and up to 10 [or fewer]; and (2)   pursuant to a prescription issued by a person authorized to prescribe under State law if sold in quantities of more than 10. b.    A licensed pharmacy that provides hypodermic syringes or needles for sale shall also be required to: (1)   maintain its supply of such instruments under or behind the pharmacy sales counter such that they are accessible only to a person standing behind a pharmacy sales counter; [and] (2)   make available to each person who purchases any such instrument, at the time of purchase, information to be developed by the Department of Health to the purchaser, about: (a)   the safe disposal of the instrument, including local disposal locations or a telephone number to call for that information; and (b)   substance abuse treatment, including a telephone number to call for assistance in obtaining treatment; and (3)   post a sign at the pharmacy sales counter advising that hypodermic syringes or needles may be purchased by a person over 18 years of age in quantities of 10 or fewer without a prescription, and that hypodermic syringes or needles may be purchased by a person over 18 years of age in quantities of more than 10 pursuant to a valid prescription. c.     In addition to any other provision of law that may apply, a person who purchases a hypodermic syringe or needle pursuant to subsection a. of this section and sells that needle or syringe to another person is guilty of a disorderly persons offense. d.    The Department of Health, in consultation with the Department of Human Services and the New Jersey State Board of Pharmacy, may, pursuant to the "Administrative Procedure Act,"P.L.1968, c.410 (C.52:14B-1 et seq.), adopt rules and regulations to effectuate the purposes of subsection b. of this section.  The Department of Health shall make the information that is to be developed pursuant to subsection b. of this section available to pharmacies and purchasers of hypodermic syringes or needles through its Internet website. (cf: P.L.2012, c.17, s.4) 2.    This act shall take effect on the 60th day after the date of enactment.